Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4985.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; STRIPES PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Students Together Respecting the Importance and Purpose of Education in Schools (STRIPES) program. new text end new text begin For a grant to the Students Together Respecting the Importance and Purpose of Education in Schools (STRIPES) program for the purposes described in subdivision 3: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,200,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grant uses. new text end new text begin Grant money appropriated for the Students Together Respecting the Importance and Purpose of Education in Schools (STRIPES) program must be directed toward a mentoring program for students that partners with teachers, parents, community members, and business leaders. The grant money must be used to: new text end new text begin (1) facilitate weekly meetings for student mentoring; new text end new text begin (2) support program operations in five existing schools; new text end new text begin (3) expand programming into additional schools; new text end new text begin (4) develop partnerships with universities to create a teacher pathway program that targets students with unique backgrounds to enter the teaching profession; and new text end new text begin (5) work with teachers across the state to create culturally responsive classrooms. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Report required. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2028, the grant recipient must submit a report detailing grant-funded activities, number of students served and mentor participants, a description of programs offered or expanded using grant funds, partnerships developed with teachers and universities, and any other relevant metrics for program participation and success. The report must be submitted to the commissioner of education and to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end